North Carolina, session 2025, HB638.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 18.
"The Equitable Escalation of Electricity Demand Act.
"§ 62-360. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Commission. – Refers to the North Carolina Utilities Commission.
(2) Data center. – A physical location and/or facility that stores computing
machines and their related hardware equipment.
(3) Dispatchable. – A source of electricity that is readily available for use on
demand and can be dispatched upon request of a power grid operator, or one
that can have its power output adjusted according to market needs, except for
routine maintenance or repairs.
(4) Economic incentives. – State grants, cash grants, tax exemptions, tax refunds,
tax credits, State funds, and other State incentives administered by the State
or its political subdivisions.
(5) Electric generation facility. – A facility that uses water, coal, natural gas, or
nuclear fuel to generate reliable or dispatchable electricity for provision to
customers.
(6) Electric vehicle (EV). – A vehicle that uses electricity stored in a rechargeable
battery and an electric motor instead of a gasoline or other carbon-based fuel
tank and internal combustion engine.
(7) Firm power. – Includes dispatchable, reliable power generation, as well as
battery storage in excess of 24 hours. Firm power does not include power that
is not dispatchable.
(8) Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle (PHEV). – Any vehicle that uses a combination
of gasoline or other carbon-based fuel and electric generation or storage; has
a battery, an electric motor, a gasoline or other carbon-based fuel tank, and an
internal combustion engine.
(9) Reliable. – A source of electricity that is not subject to intermittent availability
and has a performance standard of eighty percent (80%) or greater and only
falls below that level during routine maintenance or repairs.
"§ 62-361. Protecting electricity users reliability and availability.
(a) To cover the cost to provide sufficient additional dispatchable power, a fee shall be
placed on all new EV and PHEV vehicle charging stations connected to the electric grid and all
new EVs or PHEVs sold or licensed to operate in North Carolina. The fee is separate and apart
from any fee levied on EVs or PHEVs for infrastructure construction and maintenance, and rather
is dedicated to the construction of new dispatchable power supplies to meet expected demand,
without socializing the cost across all ratepayers.
(b) For charging stations installed and owned by the State, a fee shall be assessed to users
of the charging station. The fee should be deposited into a fund designated for electrical grid
maintenance and/or upgrade. A receipt should be provided to the consumer noting the amount of
the fee and its purpose.
Page 2 House Bill 638-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) New data centers requiring dispatchable power will be responsible for its provision,
either by contracting directly with the local utility for the construction of dispatchable power with
the approval for new power sources having to go through the usual regulatory process undertaken
by the Commission, except for the price which will be negotiated between the utility and the
source of the new demand, with safeguards so any cost overruns are not borne by ratepayers in
general. Any excess power from the dedicated dispatchable source can be sold onto the broader
grid at wholesale rates, with the profits of those sales split between the utility and the demanding
source, per their contract.
(d) If any state, or political subdivision thereof, provides economic incentives for the
construction, opening, or operations of a new data center, they shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding or other similar instrument regarding subsection (c) of this section such that failure
or refusal to meet the terms of the aforementioned memorandum of understanding, the
Commission is authorized to notify the relevant state and local agencies to commence
proceedings to recoup the current cash value of the economic incentives from the parent company
of the data center.
(e) If new data centers requiring dispatchable power cannot come to an agreement with
the local utility to construct new dispatchable power, they may submit their own plan to the
Commission for how they will develop and deliver that power. Any dispatchable power source
they construct and maintain will have to comply with the same environmental, safety, and health
regulations public utilities operate under, and any excess power generated by the new source, if
connected to the grid, can be sold to a contracting utility at an agreed upon price."
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 638-First Edition Page 3